California, session 20252026, AB1444.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares as follows:(a) For more than 100 years, the public has relied on newspapers to publish public notices informing our communities about public agency hearings, design reviews, school board budgets, trustee sales, estate administration petitions, fictitious business names, and hundreds of other important legal events of interest to the public. Through public notices that appear in legally adjudicated newspapers, the state has reached all corners of California, from sparsely populated rural areas to large urban enclaves. Public notices placed in local and ethnic newspapers have informed many diverse communities across the state and ensured access to key information about our state and local governments, citizens, and legal systems.(b) As part of expanding public access to public notices, members of the public shall by law gain access to public notices on newspaper internet websites and a statewide internet website, currently capublicnotice.com, that is maintained as a joint venture of the majority of California newspapers and contains a searchable repository of state and local public notices. At the same time, it is important to maintain access to public notices for the millions of individuals who rely on newspapers to learn about matters of public interest. Online delivery of public notices to newspaper internet websites will ensure that Californians who rely on the internet for information will have the opportunity to access public notices, while newspaper delivery of public notices will ensure that the many diverse, local, and elderly readers of newspapers will also have access to this critical public information.(c) Ethnic media has long been a distinctive genre of journalism and communications, informing, engaging, and advocating on behalf of communities underserved by both the for-profit and not-for-profit general market media. It plays a unique role in upholding the fourth estate in our democracy by facilitating cross-racial and cross-ethnic communications to facilitate social integration, promote civic engagement, and address inequalities among all of the underserved communities. (d) It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation that preserves public notice in adjudicated publications and to modernize and consolidate information contained in public notices for easier access to critical information.SEC. 2. Section 6009 is added to the Government Code, immediately following Section 6008, to read:6009. When any public notice is legally required by a statute, ordinance, bylaw, or judicial order to be published in a newspaper of general circulation, that notice shall be published in and on all of the following:(a) The newspaper’s print publication.(b) The newspaper’s internet website or electronic newspaper available on the internet.(c) The statewide internet website maintained as a repository for notices by a majority of California newspapers of general circulation, as described in this chapter. The newspaper in which the notice is published shall be responsible for publishing notices on the statewide internet website.